North Carolina, session 2025, HB217.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a4) Driver Education. – To obtain a drivers license from the Division, an applicant must
complete a course of driver education prescribed in G.S. 20-330. Completion of the course is not
required prior to obtaining a learner's permit under subsection (l) of this section. This subsection
does not apply to an applicant who (i) currently holds or has previously held a drivers license
issued by this State or another state or (ii) has satisfactorily completed a course of driver
education prescribed in G.S. 115C-215."
SECTION 2. Article 14 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-330. Mandatory driver education course, including drug and alcohol use awareness,
for unlicensed drivers 18 years and older.
(a) The Commissioner shall adopt rules to establish a course of driver education to be
offered by licensed commercial driver training schools for unlicensed individuals aged 18 and
older to prepare them for licensure in this State. The course shall promote traffic safety and
provide three hours of instruction on topics including (i) the laws of this State relating to the
operation of a motor vehicle, (ii) the physiological and psychological consequences of the use of
alcohol and other drugs and their effects on the driver of a motor vehicle, and (iii) high-risk
driving behaviors, such as fatigued driving, aggressive driving, and distracted driving, including
the use of electronic devices while driving.
(b) Regulations adopted by the Commissioner shall ensure that the course is offered both
online and in person and that a method is provided to demonstrate successful completion of the
course."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to applications
for drivers licenses submitted on or after that date.
*H217-v-2*